Massachusetts, session 194th, H759.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 72GG the 
following section:- 
Section 72HH. (a) Notwithstanding section 99 of chapter 272 or any other general or 
special law to the contrary, a nursing home, rest home or other long-term care facility shall 
permit a resident or, with the resident’s consent, a resident’s family member or health care proxy 
to place a monitoring device, including a two-way camera, in the resident’s room to monitor the 
resident’s care and living arrangements; provided, that the resident resides in a private, single-
occupancy room and the device does not monitor any other resident’s private residential space or 
any communal space. If the resident has not affirmatively objected to the monitoring device and 
the resident's physician determines that the resident lacks the ability to understand and appreciate 
the nature and consequences of remote monitoring, the resident’s health care proxy may consent 
on their behalf. 

of 2 13  (b) A person placing a monitoring device in a resident’s room pursuant to subsection (a) 
shall notify the facility prior to placing the monitoring device and post conspicuous signage to 
notify any person entering the room that the room is being remotely monitored. 
(c) The facility shall inform its employees and contractors of any monitoring device in 
use pursuant to subsection (a). 
(d) All costs related to the installation and maintenance of the monitoring device shall be 
borne by the person who installed the device. 
(e) A recording produced from the monitoring device shall not be disseminated except for 
the purposes of making a complaint to the facility or a regulatory authority, for admission into 
evidence in a civil, criminal or administrative proceeding, or as otherwise required by law. 
(f) The department shall promulgate regulations, pursuant to chapter 30A, which shall 
include minimum privacy and notification standards. The department shall develop a form for 
notification to the facility.